Tennessee, session 114, SB0943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-702(a), is amended by deleting
the language "two (2) hours" and substituting instead the language "three (3) hours", and by
deleting the language "ten (10) hours" and substituting instead the language "fifteen (15) hours".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0943
003148
- 1 -